Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.910

Effective date—Applicability—1983 c 120.

(1) This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1983.

(2) Contracts entered into before September 1, 1983, are not subject to this act.

[ 1983 c 120 s 21.]